ro-RO: Nivel de praf produs de sacâz: Ridicat; Scăzut; Mediu; Altele
fi: Hartsipölypitoisuus: Korkea; Matala; Keskitaso; Muu
pl: Poziom pylenia kalafonii: Wysoki; Niski; Średni; Inny
sv: Nivå av harpiksdamm: Hög; Låg; Medium; Övrigt
th: ระดับฝุ่นเรซิน: สูง; ต่ำ; ปานกลาง; อื่นๆ
it: Livello di polvere di colofonia: Alto; Basso; Medio; Altro
ja: ロジン粉塵レベル: 高; 低; 中; その他
cs: Hladina prachu z kalafuny: Vysoká; Nízká; Střední; Jiné
es: Nivel de polvo de resina: Alto; Bajo; Medio; Otro
vi: Mức độ bụi nhựa thông: Cao; Thấp; Trung bình; Khác
hu: Gyantapor-szint: Magas; Alacsony; Közepes; Egyéb
ru: Уровень пыли от канифоли: Высокий; Низкий; Средний; Другое
pt-BR: Breu nível de pó: Alto; Baixo; Médio; Outro
zh-CN: 松香粉尘量: 高; 低; 中; 其他
ko: 송진 가루 수준: 높음; 낮음; 중간; 기타
tr: Reçine tozu seviyesi: Yüksek; Düşük; Orta; Diğer
el: Επίπεδο σκόνης κολοφωνίου: Υψηλή; Χαμηλή; Μεσαία; Άλλο
nl: Hars stofniveau: Hoog; Laag; Gemiddeld; Overige
fr: Niveau de poussière de colophane: Élevé; Faible; Moyen; Autre
pt-PT: Nível de pó da resina: Alto; Baixo; Médio; Outro
sk-SK: Hladina prachu z kolofónie: Vysoká; Nízka; Stredná; Iné
sl-SI: Stopnja prašenja kolofonije: Visoka; Nizka; Srednja; Drugo
nb: Nivå av harpiksstøv: Høy; Lav; Medium; Annet
en: Rosin dust level: High; Low; Medium; Other
zh-TW: 松香粉塵等級: 高; 低; 中; 其他
de: Kolophoniumstaubgrad: Hoch; Niedrig; Mittel; Sonstige
bg-BG: Ниво на прах от колофон: Високо; Ниско; Средно; Друго
hr-HR: Razina prašine smole: Visoka; Niska; Srednja; Ostalo
da: Niveau af harpiksstøv: Høj; Lav; Medium; Andet
lt-LT: Kanifolijos dulkių lygis: Aukštas; Žemas; Vidutinis; Kita